Vermont statutes. Title 26 Professions and Occupations
Subchapter 4. Discipline

§§ 2051,
2052.
Repealed. 2017, No. 144 (Adj. Sess.), § 20.

§ 2053.
Unprofessional conduct; discipline.

It shall be unprofessional conduct for a licensee to:

introduce or enforce policies and procedures related to the provision of pharmacy services in a manner that results in deviation from safe practice;

unreasonably prevent or restrict a patient’s timely access to patient records or essential pharmacy services;

fail to identify and resolve conditions that interfere with a pharmacist’s ability to practice with competency and safety or create an environment that jeopardizes patient care, including by failing to provide mandated rest periods; and

repeatedly, habitually, or knowingly fail to provide resources appropriate for a pharmacist of reasonable diligence to safely complete professional duties and responsibilities, including:

drug utilization review;

immunization;

counseling;

verification of the accuracy of a prescription; and

all other duties and responsibilities of a pharmacist under State and federal laws and regulations.

Drug outlets under common ownership and control constitute a chain. Discipline against any one drug outlet in a chain may be imposed against all drug outlets in a chain, provided the State alleges in a specification of charges and the Board subsequently finds:

unprofessional conduct has occurred at one or more drug outlets;

the unprofessional conduct is attributable to pharmacy or pharmacy business-related policies, procedures, systems, or practices of the chain whether or not those practices manifested in unprofessional conduct at each individual location; and

imposition of disciplinary sanctions or conditions against all drug outlets in the chain is appropriate to protect the public.

HISTORY:

Added

2021, No. 69

, § 5.